Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3203
County clerk acting as ex officio county assessor; county assessor certificate; required.

No person shall be eligible to file for, assume, or be appointed to the office of county clerk acting as ex officio county assessor unless he or she holds a county assessor certificate issued pursuant to section 77-422.

Laws 1969, c. 622, § 13, p. 2517;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 77-1337;

Laws 1986, LB 817, § 10;

Laws 1987, LB 508, § 13;

R.S.Supp.,1988, § 77-429;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 18.